California statutes. Financial Code
 thousand dollars ($1,000) for each office or location. The commissioner shall notify each escrow agent by mail of the amount of the special assessment levied against it, and that payment of the special assessment is payable by the escrow agent within 60 days of receipt of notification by the commissioner. The funds received from the special assessment shall be deposited into the Financial Protection Fund and shall be used only for the purposes for which the special assessment is made.

(2) If payment is not made within 60 days, the commissioner may assess and collect a penalty, in addition to the special assessment, of 10 percent of the special assessment for each month or part of a month that the payment is delayed or withheld. If an escrow agent fails to pay the special assessment on or before 60 days following the day upon which payment is due, the commissioner may by order summarily suspend or revoke the certificate issued to the company. If an order is made under this subdivision, the provisions of paragraph (5) of subdivision (e) shall apply.

(3) If the amount collected
 pursuant to this subdivision exceeds the actual costs and expenses, including overhead, incurred in the administration and enforcement of this division and any deficit incurred, the excess shall be credited to each escrow agent on a pro rata basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 20, Sec. 15.   (AB 137)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17208.

All money received by the commissioner shall be paid by him or her into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Corporations Fund for the sole purpose of administering and enforcing this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

17209.

An application for a license as an escrow agent shall be signed and verified by an authorized officer of the applicant, and such application shall be accompanied by a certified copy of the articles of incorporation and a copy of the bylaws of the proposed licensee. The application shall set forth:

(a) The names and addresses of the incorporators, directors, and officers.

(b) An itemized statement of the estimated receipts and
 expenditures of the proposed first year of operations.

(c) An audited financial statement showing compliance with Section 17210.

(d) The name and address of the person, or persons, meeting the requirements of Section 17200.8, and a statement supporting such persons’ qualifications.

(e) The type of business for which the license is requested.

(f) Any other matters the commissioner may require.

(g) An application for a license as an escrow agent filed with the commissioner shall also include a completed statement of identity and questionnaire, as prescribed by the commissioner, for all stockholders, directors, officers, trustees, managers, and other persons participating in the escrow
 business directly or indirectly compensated by the escrow agent (other than usual and customary employees who file pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 17414.1 and Section 17419) and shall also include fingerprints and related information for those persons pursuant to subdivision (h). The commissioner shall notify the applicant in writing if any of the information received pursuant to this division shows that a person’s employment, participation, or ownership interest would be in violation of Section 17414.1, and the escrow agent shall deny the person the employment or interest. If the application is not satisfactorily amended to remove the deficiency within six months of the first notice of deficiency, the application shall be summarily denied. Persons required to file the employment application pursuant to Section 17419 are not required to file the statement of identity and questionnaire described in this section.

(h) (1) The fingerprint images and related information shall be submitted by the commissioner to the Department of Justice, in a manner established by the Department of Justice, for the purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions, state or federal arrests, and information as to the existence of and content of a record of state or federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on his or her own recognizance pending trial or appeal.

(2) Upon receipt, the Department of Justice shall forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation requests for federal summary criminal history information received from the commissioner pursuant to this section. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the commissioner pursuant to
 subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(3) The commissioner shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.

(4) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the costs of processing the requests pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 262, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

17209.1.

Upon the receipt of a proper and complete application for license, and all required fees, the commissioner shall immediately examine and investigate all facts connected with the proposal, including but not limited to its stockholders, directors, officers and managers, proposed location, and estimated receipts and expenditures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 663, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

17209.2.

The commissioner may or may not require an applicant to submit to an appropriate hearing. If a hearing is held the commissioner shall, on or before 10 days prior to the hearing, mail notice thereof to the applicant. At such hearing any interested person may show cause either in favor of, or opposed to, the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 663, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

17209.3.

The commissioner may refuse to issue any license being applied for, and shall refuse to issue any license being applied for if upon the commissioner’s examination and investigation, and after appropriate hearing, the commissioner finds any of the following:

(a) That the corporation is to be formed for any business other than legitimate escrow agent services, or proposes to use a name that is misleading or in conflict with the name of an existing licensee.

(b) That any incorporator, officer, or director of the applicant has, within the last 10 years, been (1) convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to a crime, or (2) committed any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit, which crime or act is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in business in accordance with the provisions of this division.

(c) That there is no officer or manager possessing a minimum of five years of responsible escrow or joint control experience stationed or to be stationed at the main office of the corporation and that there is no officer, manager or employee possessing a minimum of four years of responsible escrow or joint control experience stationed or to be stationed at each branch.

(d) That the proposed licensee’s financial program is
 unsound.

(e) A false statement of a material fact has been made in the application for license.

(f) The applicant, any officer, director, general partner, or incorporator of the applicant, or any person owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding equity securities of the applicant has violated any provision of this division or the rules thereunder or any similar regulatory scheme of the State of California or a foreign jurisdiction.

(g) The applicant has failed to comply with the Fidelity Corporation’s membership requirements set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 17312, in subdivision (a) of Section 17320, and in Sections 17331 and 17331.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 473, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17209.4.

The license shall state whether the licensee is licensed as an escrow agent or joint control agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 663, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

17210.

(a) An escrow agent licensed on or after January 1, 1986, shall maintain at all times a tangible net worth of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), including liquid assets of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in excess of current liabilities.

(b) An escrow agent licensed prior to January 1, 1986, shall maintain at all times a tangible net worth according to the following schedule:

(1) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) from January 1, 1986, through June 30, 1986, including
 liquid assets of at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in excess of current liabilities.

(2) Fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) as of July 1, 1986, including liquid assets of at least fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) in excess of current liabilities.

(3) Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) as of July 1, 1987, including liquid assets of at least twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) in excess of current liabilities.

(4) Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) as of July 1, 1988, including liquid assets of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in excess of current liabilities.

(5) Thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) as of July 1, 1989, including liquid assets of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in excess of current liabilities.

(6) Thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) as of July 1, 1990, including liquid assets of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in excess of current liabilities.

(7) Forty thousand dollars ($40,000) as of July 1, 1991, including liquid assets of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in excess of current liabilities.

(8) Forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) as of July 1, 1992, including liquid assets of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in excess of current liabilities.

(9) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) as of July 1, 1993, and thereafter, including liquid assets of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in excess of current liabilities.

(c) The
 commissioner may determine by rule as to which assets constitute liquid assets and may also determine in an individual case by a specific written ruling whether a particular asset is a liquid asset within the meaning of this section.

(d) In the case of a licensed branch office, a tangible net worth in addition to that required by subdivision (a) shall be maintained at an amount equal to 50 percent of the tangible net worth required by subdivision (a), except that licensees operating or applying for more than one branch office shall maintain an additional tangible net worth of at least 25 percent of the amount required by subdivision (a) for each branch office licensed after the first branch office location.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1560, Sec. 4.   Effective October 2, 1985.   Operative January 1, 1986, by Sec. 45 of Ch. 1560.)
-------------------------------------------

17210.1.

The license shall be kept conspicuously posted in all places of business of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1076.)
-------------------------------------------

17210.2.

(a) No escrow agent shall disseminate, or cause or permit to be disseminated, in any manner whatsoever, any statement or representation which is false, misleading, or deceptive, or which omits to state material information, or which refers to the supervision of that agent by the State of California or any department or official thereof.

(b) A licensed escrow agent, in referring to the corporation’s licensure under this law in any written or printed communication or any communication by means of recorded telephone messages or spoken on radio, television, or similar communications media, shall include the following statement: “This escrow company holds California Department of Financial Protection and Innovation Escrow License No. ____.”

(c) The commissioner may order any person to desist from any conduct which the commissioner finds to be a violation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 120.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17212.1.

All licensees shall notify the commissioner of any changes in shareholders, directors, officers, trustees, managers, and other persons participating in the escrow business directly or indirectly compensated by the escrow agent (other than usual and customary employees who file pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 17414.1 and Section 17419), by filing by certified mail, return receipt requested, for those persons a statement of identity and questionnaire, as prescribed by the commissioner for those persons, and fingerprint images and related information,
 submitted using the process established by the Department of Justice for requesting state and federal summary criminal history information. Persons who have previously submitted fingerprints or fingerprint images and related information to the commissioner may so notify the commissioner and need not submit additional fingerprint images and related information unless requested to do so by the commissioner. The commissioner shall provide written notice to both the licensee and to the person if any of the information received pursuant to this division shows that the person’s employment, participation, or ownership interest would be in violation of Section 17414.1, and upon that notification the escrow agent shall deny the person the employment or interest. No person shall have access to trust funds or sign checks or otherwise perform any activities related to the processing of escrow transactions after the licensed escrow agent has been notified by the commissioner that the person’s employment, participation,
 or ownership interest is in violation of Section 17414.1. The requirements set forth in this section are in addition to those required under Section 17213.

The commissioner may by regulation require licensees to file at such times as he or she may specify additional information as he or she may reasonably require regarding any changes in the information provided in any application filed pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 262, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

17213.

(a) An escrow agent shall not transact business pursuant to this division under any other name than that set forth in the articles of incorporation as filed with the commissioner.

(b) An escrow agent’s license is not transferable or assignable. Further, no license may be acquired, either in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, through stock purchase, foreclosure pursuant to a pledge or hypothecation, or other devices without the consent of the commissioner. Prior to the
 transfer of 10 percent or more of the shares of an escrow agent, the escrow agent shall file a new application for licensure as required by Section 17201. However, a new application for licensure shall not be required to be filed by the escrow agent if the transfer of 10 percent or more of the shares of the escrow agent will be made by an existing shareholder to another existing shareholder who also owns 10 percent or more of the shares of the escrow agent before the transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 174, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17213.1.

(a) An escrow agent’s business shall not be removed from the premises or address shown on the license without the prior approval of the commissioner, and notice of any intended change shall be transmitted to the commissioner not less than 30 days prior to the date of the intended change of location; provided, however, that the commissioner may waive the 30-day notice requirement when the move is occasioned by fire, emergency, or other catastrophe. The commissioner’s approval shall be granted or denied within 30 days from the date of the commissioner’s receipt of the licensee’s request containing such information as the commissioner
 may require.

(b) When a licensed business is to be moved a distance of five or more miles, and a change in ownership results from a transfer of 50 percent or more of the shares of the corporation, a licensee shall file an application for authorization to change location on a form furnished by the commissioner and the commissioner shall: (1) treat the matter as an application for a new license by invoking the provisions of Sections 17209, 17209.1, 17209.2, and 17209.3, and (2) require the payment of such fees as are applicable under Section 17207. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply when the actual or contemplated change of ownership is to the transferor’s ancestors, descendants, or spouse, or any custodian or trustee for the account of the transferor or the transferor’s ancestors, descendants, or spouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 663, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

17213.2.

The commissioner may order a licensed escrow agent which opens a branch office or changes its business location or locations without first obtaining the approval of the commissioner to forfeit to the people of the state a sum of up to one hundred dollars ($100) for every day for the first 10 days and ten dollars ($10) for every day thereafter during which the branch office or changed location is maintained without authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1186, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

17213.5.

Licensees of this division shall be entitled to establish additional business office locations by compliance with all of the following:

(a) Filing with the commissioner notice of the intended address, or addresses.

(b) Payment of the fees prescribed in Section 17207.

(c) Filing with the commissioner any additional bonds for the purposes set forth in Sections 17202 and
 17203. In addition to the amount required by Section 17202, the amounts for additional office locations shall be five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each additional location. The aggregate amounts of all bonds given by a licensee under this section shall be for the purpose of complying with the conditions of Sections 17202 and 17203 regardless of the office location at which any act violating those conditions takes place, and upon payment of the aggregate amount, the surety is completely released from further liability under the bond or bonds. An escrow agent licensed prior to January 1, 1996, shall comply with the requirements of this subdivision at the time of the next renewal of its bond.

(d) Filing with the commissioner financial statements prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. If the licensee’s fiscal year end is more than six months before the date of filing the application, the commissioner may require
 current financial statements which shall not be more than 60 days old. The interim financial statements may be unaudited.

(e) Filing with the commissioner the names and addresses of the licensee’s owners and employees to be stationed at the new location, showing that the operation of the additional office, or offices, will be under the complete management and control of the parent licensee.

(f) Filing with the commissioner statements offsetting and meeting each of the conditions set forth in Section 17209.3.

With respect to all applications for authorization to establish additional locations, the commissioner shall promptly commence his or her investigation and review of the application.

The commissioner shall within 30 days from the receipt by the commissioner of a separate and complete
 application, license the designated premises as a branch of the parent licensee, unless the commissioner finds (1) that the applicant has failed to comply with all of the requirements of this section, (2) that the applicant then fails to meet any of the standards applicable for the issuance of a license pursuant to Section 17209.3, or (3) that a hearing shall be held to determine whether the application should be granted or denied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 226, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17214.

(a) There is established in the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation an Escrow Law Advisory Committee consisting of 11 members. The members shall consist of the commissioner or their designee; the chairman of the board and the immediate past chairman of the board for the Escrow Agents’ Fidelity Corporation; the current chairman of the board and the immediate past chairman of the board for the Escrow Institute of California; a person selected by the commissioner to represent a different type of business ownership under this division; a person selected by the commissioner to represent a different type of business specialization; a person selected by the commissioner to represent small businesses operating pursuant to this division; a person selected by the commissioner to represent medium-sized businesses operating
 pursuant to this division; an attorney at law experienced in escrow matters selected by the commissioner; and a certified public accountant experienced in the escrow business selected by the commissioner.

Except for the members from the Escrow Agents’ Fidelity Corporation and the Escrow Institute of California, members appointed by the commissioner shall serve for a term of two years.

The committee shall meet at least quarterly. The commissioner or their designee shall chair the committee. All members shall serve without compensation or reimbursement for expenses.

Where the chairman of the board or the immediate past chairman of the board of the Escrow Agents’ Fidelity Corporation is the same person, or is unable to serve on the advisory committee, then the commissioner, after consultation with the board of directors of the Escrow Agents’ Fidelity Corporation, shall choose a member
 of the board of directors to serve on the committee. Where the president or past president of the Escrow Institute of California is the same person, or is unable to serve on the advisory committee, then the commissioner, after consultation with the board of directors of the Escrow Institute of California, shall choose a member of the board of directors to serve on the committee.

(b) The purpose of the committee is to assist the commissioner in the implementation of the commissioner’s duties under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 121.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17215.

Whenever the commissioner issues a license or order under this division, the commissioner may impose conditions that are necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions and purposes of this division and, with respect to Internet escrow agents, are also consistent with the intent of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 441, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.5. Escrow Agents’ Fidelity Corporation [17300. - 17350.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [17300. - 17305.]

17300.

“Fidelity Corporation” means the Escrow Agents’ Fidelity Corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1560, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

17301.

“Member” means any person licensed under this division who is required by Section 17312 to be a member of Fidelity Corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1560, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

17302.

“Trust obligation” means:

(a) All money and property deposited with a member within the State of California in an escrow or joint control transaction.

(b) All money and property deposited with a member to be held in trust within the State of California pursuant to a federal or state statute or requirements of a governmental agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 662, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17303.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 122.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17304.

“Loss,” within the meaning of this chapter, means the loss of trust obligations held by a member within the State of California as a result of the fraudulent or dishonest abstraction, misappropriation, or embezzlement of trust obligations by an officer, director, trustee, stockholder, manager, or employee of a member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 662, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17305.

“Monthly average escrow liability,” as used in this chapter, means the average escrow liability for the 12-month period as reported in the most recent report made by the member to the commissioner pursuant to Section 17348.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 590, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Purpose: Scope of Guarantee [17310. - 17315.]

17310.

(a) It shall be the purpose of Fidelity Corporation to indemnify a member within the State of California against loss, subject to the limitations set forth in this chapter.

(b) Fidelity Corporation shall not be liable for any consequential damages sustained by a member, or by any other person, nor for any punitive damages whatsoever.

(c) The indemnification shall be provided by any of the following:

(1) A fund established by Fidelity Corporation pursuant to Section 17320.

(2) A fidelity bond or insurance policy to be approved by the commissioner.

(3) A combination of paragraphs (1) and (2) subject, however, to the maximum coverage specified in subdivision (b) of Section 17314.

(d) Fidelity Corporation shall provide a copy to all of its members and the commissioner of the fidelity bond or insurance policy as it is acquired or renewed, and Fidelity Corporation shall promptly provide a copy to any member or successor in interest, upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 376, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17311.

(a) Persons licensed pursuant to this division shall maintain a corporation under the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) operating under the name Escrow Agents’ Fidelity Corporation.

(b) The State of California, the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, or any officer, agent, or employee of either shall not be liable in any way for the conduct of Fidelity Corporation, its directors, officers, agents, employees, or members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 123.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17312.

(a) Each person licensed pursuant to this division who is engaged in the business of receiving escrows specified in subdivision (c) and whose escrow business location is located within the State of California shall participate as a member in Fidelity Corporation in accordance with this chapter and rules established by the Board of Directors of Fidelity Corporation. Fidelity Corporation shall not deny membership to any escrow agent holding a valid unrevoked license under the Escrow Law who is required to be a member under this subdivision.

(b) Upon filing a new application for licensure as required by Section 17201, persons required to be a member of Fidelity Corporation shall file a copy
 thereof concurrently with Fidelity Corporation. If an application for licensure submitted to Fidelity Corporation contains personal or confidential information, Fidelity Corporation and its board shall maintain this information in confidence to protect the privacy of the information. The copy of the application shall include the three-thousand-dollar ($3,000) fee specified in subdivision (a) of Section 17320 and all required Fidelity Corporation Certificates set forth in Sections 17331 and 17331.1. Fidelity Corporation shall promptly furnish to the commissioner a compliance letter confirming that the applicant has satisfied the requirements to be a member of Fidelity Corporation.

(c) The required membership in Fidelity Corporation shall be limited to those licensees whose escrow business location is located within the State of
 California and who engage, in whole or in part, in the business of receiving escrows for deposit or delivery in the following types of transactions:

(1) Real property escrows, including, but not limited to, the sale, encumbrance, lease, transfer of title, loans or other obligations to be secured by a lien upon real property, and exchanges, excluding money or property held or deposited pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 51003.

(2) Bulk sale escrows, including, but not limited to, the sale or transfer of title to a business entity and the transfer of liquor licenses or other types of business licenses or permits.

(3) Fund or joint control escrows, including, but not limited to, transactions
 specified in Section 17005.1, and contracts specified in Section 10263 of the Public Contract Code.

(4) The sale, transfer of title, or refinance escrows for manufactured homes or mobilehomes.

(5) Reservation deposits required under Article 2 (commencing with Section 11010) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code or by regulation of the Bureau of Real Estate to be held in an escrow account.

(6) Escrows for sale, transfer, modification, assignment, or hypothecation of promissory notes secured by deeds of trust.

(d) Coverage required to be provided by Fidelity Corporation under this chapter shall be provided to members only for loss of trust
 obligations with respect to those types of transactions specified in subdivision (c). If a loss covered by Fidelity Corporation is also covered by a member’s general liability, dishonesty, or indemnity policy, or other private insurance policy, then the member’s private policy shall first be applied as the primary indemnity to cover the loss. However, the failure of the member’s private primary policy to indemnify the member’s loss within the time specified for Fidelity Corporation indemnity in subdivision (a) of Section 17314 shall not limit the indemnity obligations of Fidelity Corporation as defined in this chapter. Indemnity coverage for those types of transactions not specified in subdivision (c) shall be provided by escrow agents in accordance with Section 17203.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 88.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

17313.

The commissioner shall review and approve the articles of incorporation and bylaws of Fidelity Corporation before they are filed with the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1560, Sec. 11.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

17313.1.

The fiscal year of Fidelity Corporation shall commence on July 1 of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1458, Sec. 5.   Effective September 28, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

17314.

(a) Fidelity Corporation shall pay a member for loss of trust obligations subject to the limitations set forth in this chapter. Fidelity Corporation shall pay or deny the claim within 90 days of receipt of the proof of loss filed by a member, or a member’s successor in interest. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the protection to members provided by Fidelity Corporation and by the fidelity bond or insurance policy, if any, shall not extend to any transaction involving any member at any branch or business location outside
 the State of California, but shall extend only to escrow trust obligations and trust funds located within the State of California.

(b) Coverage shall be provided to members in accordance with the following schedule:MONTHLY AVERAGE ESCROW
LIABILITY PER LOCATIONCOVERAGE$0 - $ 1,000,000 $1,000,000over $1,000,000 - $ 3,000,000 $2,000,000over $3,000,000 - $ 5,000,000 $3,000,000over $5,000,000 - $ 7,500,000 $4,000,000over $7,500,000 - $10,000,000 $5,000,000Pursuant to the schedule, the minimum coverage by Fidelity Corporation for each licensed location shall be one million dollars ($1,000,000) and the maximum
 coverage for each licensed location shall be five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(c) A member shall maintain minimum coverage in accordance with the schedule in subdivision (b) and shall monitor its escrow liability monthly. An increase in escrow liability above the monthly average escrow liability coverage as provided for in subdivision (b) shall be reported immediately to Fidelity Corporation. Upon receipt of this report, Fidelity Corporation shall immediately provide for the increase in coverage, and shall immediately bill and collect pursuant to Section 17321, an amount necessary to provide for the increased coverage.

(d) Any member with a licensed location or locations with a monthly average escrow liability greater than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall obtain a bond from a corporate surety which is an admitted insurer in the State of California insuring the balance of
 trust funds not covered by Fidelity Corporation, in a ratio of one dollar of coverage for every three dollars of trust obligations not covered by Fidelity Corporation. The Fidelity Corporation shall have the authority to obtain the excess coverage bond. The cost of the bond shall be shared pro rata by those members included in the coverage.

(e) If a member establishes, to the satisfaction of the commissioner, that a bond is not available or is impracticable under subdivision (d), then, at the member’s election, either:

(1) The member shall place average trust obligations in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in a restricted escrow trust account. Each transfer or release of the funds to be made by specific resolution of the member’s board of directors and the signature of a neutral third party; or

(2) The
 licensed location of the member with average trust balances in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be subject to examinations to be conducted at a frequency as deemed appropriate and necessary by the commissioner or Fidelity Corporation, but not less frequently than once a year.

(f) Any member subject to subdivision (e) shall within 10 business days after the effective date of this section notify Fidelity Corporation of its election. A member who subsequently becomes subject to subdivision (e) shall within a like period of time notify Fidelity Corporation of its election. Fidelity Corporation shall also be notified of any change of election in a like period of time. Fidelity Corporation shall notify the commissioner within 10 business days of receipt of any notice under this subdivision of the elections made. All notices under this subdivision shall be in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 180, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17314.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, Fidelity Corporation shall not be obligated to pay any claim made by a member unless (1) the claim would, except for the dollar amount thereof, be a valid claim under the bond as prescribed by Section 17203.1 and (2) the claim is made within the time prescribed by Section 17205. The protection to members provided by Fidelity Corporation and by the fidelity bond or insurance policy, if any, shall therefore be deemed to be coextensive except as to the dollar amounts as set forth in
 Section 17314. All defenses available to the insurer under the fidelity bond or insurance policy, if any, on any claim shall also be a defense to Fidelity Corporation, as either an indemnitor or surety, on any claim brought against the corporation.

(b) No person other than a member, or the member’s successor in interest, who shall be the commissioner, a conservator, receiver, or trustee as designated by a court of competent jurisdiction, is entitled to assert a claim against Fidelity Corporation for losses covered under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 376, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17314.2.

Claims filed prior to the effective date of this chapter shall be governed by the provisions in effect when the loss occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1458, Sec. 9.   Effective September 28, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

17314.3.

(a) A deductible shall apply to each loss suffered by a member in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000), plus 5 percent of the amount by which the loss exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000). If a member with more than one licensed location suffers a covered loss at more than one location, the deductible shall apply to each location separately in proportion to the amount of the loss suffered at each such licensed location.

(b) Fidelity Corporation shall pay the full amount of any member’s loss to the member or the member’s successor in interest. The member
 shall be obligated to pay to Fidelity Corporation the amount of the member’s deductible after payment in full of the loss by Fidelity Corporation.

(c) In the event a license is surrendered, suspended, or revoked prior to payment in full by the member of all or any portion of the deductible, the member shall nevertheless be liable to Fidelity Corporation for the amount of the deductible. If the license of the member is surrendered, suspended, or revoked prior to payment in full of the deductible, Fidelity Corporation shall have priority over all other claimants, except the State of California and any conservator or receiver of the member’s estate, against the assets of the licensee, including the bond required under Section 17202.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to give any person or entity not (1) a member of Fidelity Corporation, or (2) a successor in interest of a
 member, or (3) the commissioner any right of action or any right to make a claim directly against Fidelity Corporation, its officers, directors, agents, or employees. Fidelity Corporation shall be entitled to recover its reasonable costs and attorney’s fees as an item of costs, as provided for in paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 1033.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, in defending any claim made directly against Fidelity Corporation, not authorized in this division.

(e) If a member fails to pay the deductible within the time set forth in the bylaws of Fidelity Corporation, Fidelity Corporation may bring an action at law or in equity against the member to recover the amount of the deductible. Fidelity Corporation shall recover its reasonable costs and attorney’s fees as an item of costs, as provided for in paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 1033.5 of
 the Code of Civil Procedure, provided, that the payment of the costs and attorney’s fees will not cause the member to be in violation of Section 17202, 17202.1, or 17210.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1431, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

17315.
